Missouri, session 2026, SB1613.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 9.413, to read as
follows:
9.413. November twenty-fourth each year is hereby
designated as "Frankie Muse Freeman Day" in Missouri. The
citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
appropriate events and activities to celebrate Frankie Muse
Freeman, a St. Louis attorney who was a champion for civil
rights, won a landmark case that ended legal racial
discrimination in St. Louis public housing, and was the
first black woman appointed to the United States Commission
on Civil Rights by president Lyndon B. Johnson.
✓